Wyoming, session 2025, HB0110.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 23-2-303(a) and by creating a new
subsection (h) is amended to read:

23-2-303. Trapping licenses; tagging; traps and
snares; penalty; confiscation; inspection; interference
with trapping.

(a) Any person may, in the discretion of the
department upon application and the payment of the proper
HB0110

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0411
fee, receive a license to trap any furbearing animal. The
department shall only issue a trapping license to a
nonresident only if: his state issues licenses to Wyoming
residents to trap the same species for which residents of
that state may be licensed to trap in that state. Any
nonresident applying for a Wyoming trapping license shall
furnish:

(i) A notarized affidavit stating the
applicant's legal address including The species applied for
can be lawfully trapped in his state of residence; and

(ii) A copy of the most current statutes or
rules and regulations of the applicant's state of residence
which show that the state issues nonresident trapping
licenses which authorize Wyoming residents to trap the same
species for which residents of that His state may be
licensed to trap in that state issues nonresident permits
to Wyoming residents.

(h) Any nonresident applying for a Wyoming trapping
license shall furnish:

HB0110

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0411
(i) A notarized affidavit stating the
applicant's legal address including his state of residence;
and

(ii) A copy of the most current statutes or
rules and regulations of the applicant's state of residence
which show that the state issues nonresident trapping
licenses which authorize Wyoming residents to trap the same
species for which residents of that state may be licensed
to trap in that state.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0110